Washington statutes.
RCW 41.04.803

Application of chapter 236, Laws of 2012.

(1) Chapter 236, Laws of 2012 is curative and remedial and is applicable to any future determination of eligibility for membership in a retirement system under chapters 41.26, 41.32, 41.35, 41.37, and 41.40 RCW.

(2) Chapter 236, Laws of 2012 does not apply to or contravene any prior final decision of the state supreme court regarding the interpretation of the statutes addressed in chapter 236, Laws of 2012.

[ 2012 c 236 s 7.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Application—2012 c 236: See note following RCW 41.26.030.